Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB282.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 441.1(c) and (d) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 441.1. Persons Eligible for Medical Assistance.--* * *(c) Except as [provided under subsection (a)(4) and (5)] otherwise provided in this section, upon notification of incarceration, the department shall temporarily suspend[, for a period of not more than two years,] medical assistance for a 1234567891011121314151617 recipient who becomes incarcerated in a correctional institution. The suspension of medical assistance shall cease and the recipient shall continue to receive medical assistance upon notification of an inmate's release from the correctional institution, subject to the eligibility requirements under the Commonwealth's approved Title XIX State Plan.(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c), upon [notification from a correctional institution of an inmate's release and] the department's receipt of an inmate's application, the department shall determine the inmate's eligibility for medical assistance. Except as provided under [subsection] subsections (a)(4) and (5) and (e) and to the extent consistent with Federal law, medical assistance may not be provided until the date of the inmate's release.(e) Notwithstanding subsections (c) and (d) and subject SUBJECT to Federal approval, beginning January 1, 2026, the department is authorized to establish a reentry program under the medical assistance program for recipients who are incarcerated in a correctional institution, according to the following:(1) The reentry program shall, at a minimum, provide eligible recipients access to the following: (i) Substance use disorder treatment and case management services prior to release from a participating correctional institution.(ii) A thirty-day supply of medication upon release from a participating correctional institution. SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT AND CASE MANAGEMENT SERVICES PRIOR TO RELEASE FROM A PARTICIPATING CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION.(2) A county may request to have its county correctional 20250HB0282PN1594 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institution participate in the reentry program, according to the following:(i) The request to participate must be on a form and contain the information as the department prescribes.(ii) The application to the department must be adopted by a majority vote of the governing body and transmitted to the department accompanied by the signature of the chairperson of the board of commissioners and attested by the chief clerk of the county or, in the case of a home rule county, by the equivalent consistent with the provisions of the county charter.(3) The department may approve a county's request under paragraph (2) based on capacity of the program and the county's plan to provide reentry services. In reviewing the county's plan, the department shall, at a minimum, consider the following:(i) The county's readiness and capacity to provide reentry services.(ii) The county's plan to provide information to the department for suspension and reactivation of medical assistance for recipients.(iii) Demonstrated support from the county's criminal justice collaborative or criminal justice advisory board.(iv) Demonstrated commitment and cooperation by the county correctional institution and its employed or contracted providers of health care services to participate in the reentry program.(4) A county's participation in the reentry program is voluntary.(5) The department may continue to accept applications under this subsection from nonparticipating counties on an annual 20250HB0282PN1594 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 basis.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0282PN1594 - 4 - 12